Utah statutes.
72-6-119.   "511" Traveler information services -- Lead agency --
Implementation -- Cooperation -- Rulemaking -- Costs.
(1)  As used in this section, "511" or "511 service" means three-digit
telecommunications dialing to access intelligent transportation system --
traveler information service provided in the state in accordance with the
Federal Communications Commission and United States Department of
Transportation.
(2)  The department is the state's lead agency for implementing 511 service
and is the state's point of contact for coordinating 511 service with
telecommunications service providers.
(3)  The department shall:
(a)  implement and administer 511 service in the state;
(b)  coordinate with the highway authorities and public transit districts to
provide advanced multimodal traveler information through 511 service and other
means; and
(c)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, make rules as necessary to implement this section.
(4) (a)  In accordance with Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act,
the department shall enter into agreements or contracts with highway
authorities and public transit districts to share the costs of implementing
and administering 511 service in the state.
(b)  The department shall enter into other agreements or contracts relating to
the 511 service to offset the costs of implementing and administering 511
service in the state.
